Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Incorporation

§ 21-1-13.
Preparing and filing of petition.

Whenever the inhabitants of any unincorporated territory shall desire to incorporate such territory as a city or town, they shall prepare a petition and file same in the chancery court of the county in which such territory is located or, if the territory is located in more than one county, the chancery court of either county. Said petition shall meet the following requirements:

it shall describe accurately the metes and bounds of the territory proposed to be incorporated and there shall be attached to such petition a map or plat of the boundaries of the proposed municipality;

it shall set forth the corporate name which is desired;

it shall be signed by at least two-thirds of the qualified electors residing in the territory proposed to be incorporated;

it shall set forth the number of inhabitants of such territory;

it shall set forth the assessed valuation of the real property in such territory according to the latest available assessments thereof;

it shall state the aims of the petitioners in seeking said incorporation, and shall set forth the municipal and public services which said municipal corporation proposes to render and the reasons why the public convenience and necessity would be served by the creation of such municipal corporation;

it shall contain a statement of the names of the persons the petitioners desire appointed as officers of such municipality; and

it shall be sworn to by one or more of the petitioners.

When such a petition shall be filed, it shall be docketed as are other suits and causes in the chancery courts of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 2921, 2922; 1906, §§ 3312, 3313; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5809, 5810; 1930, §§ 2388, 2390; 1942, § 3374-03; Laws, 1898, ch. 74; Laws, 1908, ch. 74; Laws, 1914, ch. 244; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-15.
Publication of notice of proposed incorporation.

After the filing of said petition, and upon request therefor by the petitioners, the chancellor shall set a day certain, either in term time or in vacation, for the hearing of such petition and notice shall be given to all persons interested in, affected by, or having objections to the proposed incorporation, that the hearing on the petition will be held on the day fixed by the chancellor and that all such persons will have the right to appear and enter their objections, if any, to the proposed incorporation. The said notice shall be given by publication thereof in some newspaper published or having a general circulation in the territory proposed to be incorporated once each week for three consecutive weeks, and by posting a copy of such notice in three or more public places in such territory. The first publication of such notice and the posted notice shall be made at least thirty days prior to the day fixed for the hearing of said petition, and such notice shall contain a full description of the territory proposed to be incorporated. However, if any of the territory proposed to be incorporated is located within three miles of the boundaries of an existing municipality, then such existing municipality shall be made a party defendant to such petition and shall be served with process in the manner provided by law, which process shall be served at least thirty days prior to the date set for the hearing.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-04; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-17.
Hearing on petition; decree.

At the time fixed, the chancellor shall proceed to hear all evidence offered in support of said petition, together with all objections, if any, that may be presented touching or bearing upon the question of whether or not the proposed incorporation is reasonable and is required by the public convenience and necessity. The chancellor shall have the power, however, to grant such reasonable continuances as justice may require. If the chancellor finds from the evidence that the proposed incorporation is reasonable and is required by the public convenience and necessity, then he shall enter a decree declaring such municipal corporation to be created as requested in such petition, which decree shall give an accurate description of the territory included in such municipal corporation, shall classify such municipal corporation according to law, and shall set forth the names of the persons which the petitioners desire as officers of such municipality. The chancellor shall have the power, however, in granting any such incorporation to grant same in whole or in part by modifying or decreasing the territory to be included within such municipal corporation. If the chancellor finds from the evidence that the proposed incorporation is not reasonable and is not required by the public necessity and convenience, then a decree shall be entered denying such incorporation. Whenever any municipal corporation shall be created as herein provided, a map or plat of the boundaries of such municipal corporation shall be filed with the chancery clerk and shall be recorded by him in the official plat book of the county. The decree of the chancellor, either creating or denying such incorporation, shall become effective after the passage of ten days from the date of such decree, unless an appeal be taken therefrom as is provided in Section 21-1-21.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-05; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-19.
Costs.

In the event no objection is made to such petition, all costs of the hearing before the chancellor shall be taxed against the petitioners. In the event objection is made to such petition, such costs may be taxed by the chancellor in such manner as may be deemed by him to be equitable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-09; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-21.
Appeal.

Any person interested in or aggrieved by the decree of the chancellor, and who was a party to the proceedings in the chancery court, may prosecute an appeal therefrom to the supreme court within ten days from the date of such decree by furnishing an appeal bond in the sum of five hundred dollars with two good and sufficient sureties, conditioned to pay all costs of the appeal in event the decree is affirmed. Such appeal bond shall be subject to the approval of the chancery clerk and shall operate as a supersedeas. If the decree of the chancellor be affirmed by the supreme court, then such decree shall go into effect after the passage of ten days from the date of the final judgment thereon, and the party or parties prosecuting such appeal and the sureties on their appeal bond shall be adjudged to pay all costs of such appeal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-08; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-23.
Copy of decree sent to Secretary of State.

In the event the decree of the chancellor be in favor of the creation of such municipal corporation and no appeal is taken therefrom within ten days from the date of such decree, as is provided in Section 21-1-21, the chancery clerk shall forward to the secretary of state a certified copy of the decree creating such municipal corporation and such decree shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state and remain a permanent record thereof. In the event an appeal is taken from the decree creating such a municipal corporation, and the action of the chancellor is affirmed, then a copy of said decree shall be forwarded to the secretary of state within ten days after receipt of the mandate from the supreme court notifying the clerk of the affirmance of such decree.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-06; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-25.
Commissioning of officers; first meeting.

Upon receipt of the certified copy of the decree creating a municipal corporation, the secretary of state shall issue commissions to the persons named therein to be appointed as the officers of such municipality.

As soon as practicable after receipt of such commissions from the Secretary of State, the officers receiving such commissions shall meet, upon the call of the mayor-designate and at a time and place to be fixed by him, and shall take the oath of office and shall give bond and security as other like officers are required to do under the provisions of this title. Such officers shall hold office until their successors are elected at the next ensuing municipal election and shall have qualified according to law. Such first meeting of the governing authorities shall be held within thirty days after the date such commissions are issued by the secretary of state, and at such meeting a certified copy of the decree of the chancery court creating such municipal corporation shall be entered upon the minutes of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3374-06, 3374-07; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, §§ 6, 7, eff from and after July 1, 1950.